Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,187
Pardon by mayor or chairperson of board of trustees; effect.

Upon receipt of notice of a pardon granted by any mayor of any city or any chairperson of the board of trustees of any village, the director shall not restore points assessed against an individual as provided by section 60-4,182 or reinstate any permit to operate a motor vehicle revoked pursuant to section 60-4,183.

Laws 1975, LB 200, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-669.33;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 85.